Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
State Bond Commission

§ 31-17-1.
Composition of State Bond Commission.

The State Bond Commission shall be composed of the Governor, the Attorney General, and the State Treasurer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4380; Laws, 1936, ch. 196.

§ 31-17-3.
General powers of State Bond Commission.

The State Bond Commission, with the approval and consent of the State Auditor of Public Accounts and the chairman of the State Tax Commission, is hereby authorized to purchase outstanding bonds of the State of Mississippi, retire such bonds, and pay the purchase price thereof out of any surplus remaining in the state treasury at the end of any fiscal year, all in accord with the provisions of Sections 31-17-21 through 31-17-25. The State Bond Commission, with the consent and approval of the state auditor of public accounts and the chairman of the State Tax Commission, shall determine the amount of bonds to be purchased, the maximum price to be paid therefor not to exceed par and accrued interest, and the date upon which it will receive proposals to purchase such bonds, all in accord with the provisions of Sections 31-17-21 through 31-17-25.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4380; Laws, 1936, ch. 196.

§ 31-17-5.
Requests for proposals for bond counsel and certain information about bond counsel once selected to be posted on Department of Finance and Administration and State Treasurer websites.

When a request for proposals for bond counsel for a general obligation or revenue bond issue is issued on behalf of the State Bond Commission, the request for proposal shall be posted on the website of the Department of Finance and Administration and the State Treasurer.

Once bond counsel is selected for a bond issue, the name and address of the counsel selected shall be posted on the website of the Department of Finance and Administration and the State Treasurer. The amount of any payments made to bond counsel for his or her services as bond counsel shall be posted on the website of the Department of Finance and Administration and the State Treasurer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 569, § 42, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 2013).